Hawaii statutes.
§346-6 Appropriations; expenditures;
donations. Moneys provided by the legislature for expenditure by the
department of human services shall be expended upon vouchers approved by the
director of human services or the director's duly authorized subordinates.

All contributions or donations of money to the
department shall be paid into the state treasury to be expended according to
law and for purposes in accordance with the terms and conditions of the
contributions or donations, and all such moneys are appropriated for such
purposes; provided that no such contributions or donations shall be accepted by
the department except for expenditures within the purposes of this chapter.
The department may accept donations other than money, provided the donations may
be used within the purposes of this chapter, and if accepted, may pay for the
storage, handling, and distribution of same; provided that any capital
expenditures in connection with the storage, handling, and distribution shall
be approved by the governor. [L 1941, c 296, pt of §1; RL 1945, §4822; RL 1955,
§108-2; HRS §346-6; am L 1970, c 105, §5; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 339, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next